Illinois, session 104th, HB1920.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5-130 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5-130 new)7    Sec. 25-5-130. Quick-take; Cook County; Calumet City.8    (a) Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be used 9for a period of no more than 2 years after the effective date 10of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly by Cook 11County and the City of Calumet City for the acquisition of the 12following described property for the purpose of economic 13development: 14    REAL PROPERTY IN THE CITY OF CALUMET CITY, COUNTY OF COOK, 15    STATE OF ILLINOIS, DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS: 16    PARCEL 1:17    THAT PART OF THE NORTH WEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 18    TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL 19    MERIDIAN, WHICH LIES NORTH AND EAST OF THE MARGIN OF THE 20    LITTLE CALUMET RIVER, EXCEPTING THEREFROM THE FOLLOWING:21        (A) THE EAST 660 FEET OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER;  HB1920- 2 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1        (B) THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER WHICH IS BOTH 2        SOUTH OF A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 2,056.78 FEET SOUTH OF 3        THE NORTH LINE OF SAID QUARTER AND WEST OF A LINE 300 4        FEET EAST OF AND PARALLEL TO THE EAST LINE OF TORRENCE 5        AVENUE;6        (C) THAT PART TAKEN, USED OR DEDICATED FOR TORRENCE 7        AVENUE, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THAT PART TAKEN 8        IN ORDER VESTING TITLE RECORDED OCTOBER 4, 2016 AS 9        DOCUMENT NO. 1627816040;10        (D) THAT PART THEREOF CONVEYED TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE 11        COMPANY OF NORTHERN ILLINOIS BY DEEDS DULY RECORDED 12        JULY 24, 1926 AS DOCUMENTS 9349854 AND 9350297;13        (E) THAT PART OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER DESCRIBED AS 14        FOLLOWS:15    COMMENCING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF SAID QUARTER; 16    THENCE SOUTH ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID QUARTER, A 17    DISTANCE OF 230 FEET; THENCE EASTERLY ON A LINE PARALLEL 18    TO THE NORTH LINE OF SAID QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 250 FEET; 19    THENCE NORTH A DISTANCE OF 230 FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTH 20    LINE OF SAID QUARTER; THENCE WESTERLY ALONG SAID NORTH 21    LINE A DISTANCE OF 250 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.22        (F) THAT PART OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER OF SECTION 23        19, TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 24        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:25    BEGINNING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 26    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH 0 DEGREES 09 MINUTES   HB1920- 3 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    50 SECONDS WEST ON THE WEST LINE OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 2    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 1635.56 FEET; THENCE 3    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 4    260.28 FEET; THENCE NORTH 28 DEGREES 30 MINUTES 00 SECONDS 5    EAST A DISTANCE OF 59.87 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 6    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 519.21 FEET; THENCE 7    SOUTH 45 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 8    24.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 9    WEST A DISTANCE OF 110.00 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 45 DEGREES 17 10    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 10.00 FEET; THENCE 11    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 12    615.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 0 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 13    EAST ON A LINE PERPENDICULAR TO THE NORTH LINE OF SAID 14    NORTH WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 543.00 FEET TO THE NORTH 15    LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER, THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 16    42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS EAST ON THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH 17    WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 10 55.93 FEET TO THE PLACE OF 18    BEGINNING.19        (G) THAT PART OF THE NORTH WEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 20        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 21        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS BOUNDED 22        AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:23    COMMENCING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF SAID SECTION; 24    THENCE SOUTH ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST 25    QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 1284 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE EAST 26    71.05 FEET (MEASURED AT RIGHT ANGLE) TO A POINT ON THE EAST   HB1920- 4 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    LINE OF TORRENCE AVENUE, SAID POINT BEING THE POINT OF 2    BEGINNING; THENCE CONTINUING EAST ALONG THE LAST DESCRIBED 3    COURSE A DISTANCE OF 5 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE SOUTH ALONG 4    A LINE PARALLEL TO AND DISTANT 5 FEET FROM SAID EAST LINE 5    OF TORRENCE AVENUE A DISTANCE OF 316.00 FEET TO A POINT; 6    THENCE WEST, FORMING A RIGHT ANGLE WITH THE LAST DESCRIBED 7    COURSE A DISTANCE OF 5 FEET TO A POINT ON SAID EAST LINE OF 8    TORRENCE AVENUE; THENCE NORTH A DISTANCE OF 316.00 FEET TO 9    THE POINT OF BEGINNING;10        (H) THAT PART OF THE NORTH WEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 11        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 12        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS, BOUNDED 13        AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:14    COMMENCING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF SAID NORTH WEST 15    QUARTER; THENCE EAST A DISTANCE OF 250 FEET TO A POINT; 16    THENCE SOUTH A DISTANCE OF 30 FEET (MEASURED AT RIGHT 17    ANGLE) TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF 159TH STREET, SAID 18    POINT BEING THE POINT OF BEGINNING, THENCE CONTINUING 19    SOUTH ALONG THE LAST DESCRIBED COURSE A DISTANCE OF 30 20    FEET TO A POINT; THENCE EAST ALONG A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 21    DISTANCE 60 FEET FROM THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST 22    QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 722.77 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE 23    NORTH ALONG A LINE FORMING A RIGHT ANGLE WITH THE LAST 24    DESCRIBED COURSE, A DISTANCE OF 30 FEET TO A POINT ON SAID 25    EAST LINE OF 159TH STREET; THENCE WEST A DISTANCE OF 26    722.77 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING;  HB1920- 5 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1        (I) THAT PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 2        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 3        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, BEING THE NORTH 150 FEET OF THE 4        SOUTH 600 FEET OF THE WEST 150 FEET OF THE EAST 810 5        FEET OF SAID QUARTER SECTION, ALL IN COOK COUNTY, 6        ILLINOIS.7        (J) LOT 1 OF CALUMET SONIC SUBDIVISION, BEING A 8        SUBDIVISION OF PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF 9        SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE 10        THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, ACCORDING TO THE PLAT 11        THEREOF RECORDED NOVEMBER 5, 2010 AS DOCUMENT NO. 12        1030934049, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.  13    PARCEL 2:14    EASEMENT FOR INGRESS AND EGRESS AND COMMON USE OF PARKING 15    OVER, UNDER, AND ACROSS THOSE PORTIONS OF THE FOLLOWING 16    DESCRIBED LAND:17    THAT PART OF SAID NORTH WEST 1/4 OF SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 36 18    NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, 19    BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:20    BEGINNING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 21    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH 0 DEGREES 09 MINUTES 22    50 SECONDS WEST ON THE WEST LINE OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 23    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 1635.56 FEET; THENCE 24    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 25    260.28 FEET; THENCE NORTH 28 DEGREES 30 MINUTES 00 SECONDS   HB1920- 6 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    EAST A DISTANCE OF 59.87 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 2    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 519.21 FEET; THENCE 3    NORTH 45 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 4    24.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 5    WEST A DISTANCE OF 110.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 45 DEGREES 17 6    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 10.00 FEET; THENCE 7    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 8    615.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 0 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 9    EAST ON A LINE PERPENDICULAR TO THE NORTH LINE OF SAID 10    NORTH WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 543.00 FEET TO THE NORTH 11    LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 12    42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS EAST ON THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH 13    WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 1055.93 FEET TO THE PLACE OF 14    BEGINNING; EXCEPTING THEREFROM THE NORTH 30 FEET THEREOF 15    AND ALSO EXCEPTING THEREFROM THAT PART THEREOF CONVEYED IN 16    DEED FROM SEARS ROEBUCK AND COMPANY, TO THE STATE OF 17    ILLINOIS, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS AND BUILDING DATED 18    AUGUST 29, 1966, AND RECORDED SEPTEMBER 28, 1966 AS 19    DOCUMENTED NUMBER 19955757 AND FILED SEPTEMBER 28, 1966 AS 20    DOCUMENTED NUMBER LR2294057, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.21    AS CREATED BY OPERATING AGREEMENT DATED JUNE 23, 1965, A 22    MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED JULY 22, 1965 AS DOCUMENT 23    NUMBER 19534723, AS AMENDED BY AMENDMENT DATED JUNE 15, 24    1984, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED AUGUST 27, 1984 25    AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 27229390, AND SECONDS AMENDMENT DATED 26    FEBRUARY 3, 1933, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED MARCH   HB1920- 7 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    2, 1933 AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 93154148.  2    PARCEL 3:3    THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER WHICH IS BOTH SOUTH OF 4    A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 2,056.78 FEET SOUTH OF THE NORTH 5    LINE OF SAID QUARTER AND WEST OF A LINE 300 FEET EAST OF 6    AND PARALLEL TO THE EAST LINE OF TORRENCE AVENUE;7    EXCEPTING THEREFROM THAT PART OF THE LAND CONVEYED TO THE 8    STATE OF ILLINOIS, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS AND 9    BUILDINGS RECORDED AS DOCUMENT NO. 19940215.10    AND EXCEPTING THAT PART OF THE LAND TAKEN IN CONDEMNATION 11    CAST NO. 14 L 050215.  12    PARCEL 7:13    THAT PART OF THE SOUTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 14    36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST ON THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN 15    LYING EAST OF THE LITTLE CALUMET RIVER AND WEST OF THE 16    NORTH LINE OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY OF ILLINOIS AS 17    ESTABLISHED IN DEED 8393986 FALLING IN THE FOLLOWING 18    DESCRIBED LANDS:19    COMMENCING AT A POINT WHICH IS 10 CHAINS WEST OF THE 20    NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE NORTHWEST FRACTIONAL QUARTER OF 21    SECTION 19, IN TOWNSHIP 36, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 22    PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN; THENCE WEST 11 CHAINS AND 34 LINKS; 23    THENCE SOUTH 33 CHAINS AND 75 LINKS TO THE MARGIN OF THE 24    CALUMET RIVER; THENCE ALONG THE MARGIN OF SAID RIVER IN AN   HB1920- 8 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    EASTERLY DIRECTION UNTIL IT INTERSECTS A LINE RUNNING 2    NORTH AND SOUTH OF THE PLACE OF BEGINNING; THENCE NORTH 40 3    CHAINS TO THE PLACE OF BEGINNING, ALSO KNOWN AS LOT 2 OF A 4    SUBDIVISION OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER FRACTIONAL SECTION, 5    SITUATED IN THE TOWN OF THORNTON IN THE COUNTY OF COOK, IN 6    THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.  7    PARCEL 8:8    RIGHTS AND EASEMENTS AS GRANTED IN THE OPERATING AGREEMENT 9    BETWEEN SEARS, ROEBUCK AND COMPANY AND LASALLE NATIONAL 10    BANK UNDER TRUST NUMBER 30703, GOVERNING FUTURE 11    DEVELOPMENT AND USE OF THE PROPERTY AFFECTED THEREBY, AND 12    PROVIDING FOR INGRESS AND EGRESS BETWEEN THE AFFECTED 13    PARCELS AND FOR UTILITY EASEMENTS, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH 14    AGREEMENT WAS RECORDED JULY 22, 1965 AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 15    19534723 AND REGISTERED JULY 22, 1965 AS DOCUMENT 16    LR2220909.17    AMENDMENT TO SAID OPERATING AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES 18    ABOVE MENTIONED, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED AUGUST 19    27, 1984 AS DOCUMENT 27229390 AND REGISTERED AUGUST 27, 20    1984 AS DOCUMENT LR3390805.21    MEMORANDUM OF SECOND AMENDMENT TO OPERATING AGREEMENT 22    DATED FEBRUARY 03, 1993 AND RECORDED MARCH 02, 1993 AS 23    DOCUMENT NUMBER 93154148. 24    (b) This Section is repealed 3 years after the effective 25date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.   HB1920- 9 -LRB104 09399 JRC 19458 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.